Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.173

Prototypical funding model—District allocation of state resources—Public access on internet-based portal.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall implement and maintain an internet-based portal that provides ready public access to the state's prototypical school funding model for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260. The portal must provide citizens the opportunity to view, for each local school building, the staffing levels and other prototypical school funding elements that are assumed under the state funding formula. The portal must also provide a matrix displaying how individual school districts are deploying those same state resources through their allocation of staff and other resources to school buildings, so that citizens are able to compare the state assumptions to district allocation decisions for each local school building.

[ 2010 c 236 s 12.]